Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,277
Diversion of utility services; rebuttable presumption; when.

(1) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a tenant or occupant at any premises where bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized metering is proven to exist caused or had knowledge of such bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized metering if the tenant or occupant (a) had access to the part of the utility supply system on the premises where the bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized metering is proven to exist and (b) was responsible or partially responsible for payment, either directly or indirectly, to the utility or to any other person for utility services to the premises.

(2) There shall be a rebuttable presumption that a customer at any premises where bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized metering is proven to exist caused or had knowledge of such bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized metering if the customer controlled access to the part of the utility supply system on the premises where the bypassing, tampering, or unauthorized metering was proven to exist.

Laws 1983, LB 350, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-331.03;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 423.